Massachusetts, session 194th, SD2945.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 137 of chapter 140 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (d) the following new
subsection:-
(e) A keeper of a dog may, while in a licensed kennel, remove an affixed tag if the dog
has another means of identification including, but not limited to, a microchip or tattoo; provided,
however, that proof of licensure by means of tag, electronic record, certificate or other verifiable
method shall be accessible and available onsite at the kennel. The licensed kennel or dog keeper
shall maintain access to a microchip reader capable of reading common microchip formats if
microchips are being used for identification purposes in lieu of a tag for any dogs onsite.
SECTION 2. Subsection (b) of section 145B of said chapter 140, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following words:- A keeper of a dog may
choose, while in a licensed kennel, to not affix the tag if the dog has another means of
of 2

identification including, but not limited to, a microchip or tattoo; provided, however, that the
certificate shall be made accessible and onsite. The licensed kennel or dog keeper shall maintain
access to a microchip reader capable of reading common microchip formats if microchips are
being used for identification purposes in lieu of a tag for any dogs onsite.
SECTION 3. Section 85A of chapter 272 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out the word “dollars.” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
dollars; provided, however, that a keeper of a dog may, while in a licensed kennel, remove a
license tag of the dog in accordance with section 137 or 145B of chapter 140, and such removal
shall not constitute a violation of this section.
of 2